Arkansas statutes. Title 8 Environmental Law
Chapter 1
General Provisions

Subchapter 1
— General Provisions

Effective Dates.

Acts 1991, No. 454, § 6: Mar. 11, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the Director of the Department of Pollution Control and Ecology is in need of additional authority to deny applications for the issuance or transfer of permits if he determines that an applicant, or person with substantial influence over the applicant, has a history of noncompliance with environmental laws or regulations; this act provides such authority and should be given immediate effect in order to grant additional environmental protection as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the protection of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1993, No. 1254, § 9: July 1, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the provisions of this act are of critical importance to the state's ability to provide efficient and effective programs in the protection of the state's environment as mandated through the activities of the Department of Pollution Control and Ecology. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1993.”

Acts 1995, No. 509, § 7: Mar. 2, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that an adjustment is needed to adjust the collection cap due to additional fees to be generated by the permitting of composting facilities and transfer stations, and to clarify cost recovery authorization for administrative services provided by the Department of Pollution Control and Ecology. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2007, No. 1281, § 52: July 1, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2007 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2007 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

8-1-101. Purpose.

It is the purpose of this chapter to authorize the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission to establish a system of fees for the issuance of permits required by §§ 8-4-101 — 8-4-106, 8-4-201 — 8-4-229, 8-4-301 — 8-4-314, 8-6-201 — 8-6-212, 8-6-214, and 8-9-403, to defray costs of other services provided and to authorize the Division of Environmental Quality to collect and enforce the fees.

The express purpose of these fees shall be to defray the administrative costs of issuance, renewal, inspection, modification, and monitoring associated with these permits and other services provided.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 817, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1916; Acts 1993, No. 163, § 1; 1993, No. 165, § 1; 1995, No. 509, § 1; 1999, No. 1164, § 3; 2019, No. 693, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 2417.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Sections 8-6-215 — 8-6-217 have been superseded by § 8-1-106.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 693 substituted “8-6-214” for “8-6-213 [repealed], 8-6-214, 8-6-215 — 8-6-217 [superseded]” and substituted “the fees” for “these fees” in (a).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Department of Environmental Quality” in (a).

8-1-102. Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Annual review fee” means that fee required by this chapter to be submitted upon the anniversary date of issuance of the permits required by the statutes enumerated in subdivision (6) of this section;

“Commission” means the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission;

[Repealed.]

[Repealed.]

“Facility” means any activity or operation within a specific geographic location, including property contiguous thereto. A facility may consist of several treatment, storage, or disposal operational units;

“Initial fee” means the fee required by this chapter to be submitted with all applications for water, air, and solid waste permits required by §§ 8-4-101 — 8-4-106, 8-4-201 — 8-4-229, 8-4-301 — 8-4-314, 8-6-201 — 8-6-212, 8-6-214, or 8-9-403; and

“Modification fee” means the fee required to be submitted by this chapter for modification of any existing or future permit required by the statutes enumerated in subdivision (6) of this section, either at the request of the permittee or as required by the laws of the State of Arkansas or the rules of the Division of Environmental Quality.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 817, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1917; Acts 1993, No. 163, § 2; 1993, No. 165, § 2; 1995, No. 509, § 2; 1999, No. 1164, § 4; 2019, No. 315, § 422; 2019, No. 693, § 2; 2019, No. 910, § 2418.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Sections 8-6-215 — 8-6-217 have been superseded by § 8-1-106.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (7).

The 2019 amendment by No. 693 substituted “the fee” for “that fee” and substituted “8-6-214” for “8-6-213 [repealed], 8-6-214, 8-6-215 — 8-6-217 [superseded]” in (6).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 repealed (3) and (4).

8-1-103. Powers and duties.

The Division of Environmental Quality and the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission shall have the following powers and duties, respectively:

Following a public hearing and based upon a record calculating the reasonable administrative costs of evaluating and taking action on permit applications and of implementing and enforcing the terms and conditions of permits and variances, the commission shall establish, by rule, reasonable fees for initial issuance, annual review, and modification of water, air, or solid waste permits required by §§ 8-4-101 — 8-4-106, 8-4-201 — 8-4-229, 8-4-301 — 8-4-314, 8-6-201 — 8-6-212, 8-6-214, and 8-9-403. These fees shall consist of initial fees, annual review fees, and modification fees, as defined in § 8-1-102.

All fees will be capped at no more than the appropriation. Provided, however, in setting reasonable permit fees, the commission shall:

Set water permit fees calculated to generate revenues in any fiscal year greater than three and twenty-five hundredths (3.25) times the total amount collected from water permit fees in fiscal year 1992-1993.

Provided, water permit fee revenues generated through permits issued for new facilities which are permitted after July 1, 1995, shall not be subject to the overall fee cap specified for water permit fees herein;

Effective July 1, 2000, set water permit fees calculated to generate no revenues in any fiscal year greater than three and five-tenths (3.5) times the total amount collected from water permit fees in fiscal year 1992-1993.

Provided, however, effective July 1, 2001, water permit fee revenues may be increased up to three percent (3%) per year; and

Set solid waste permit fees for Class I and Class III landfills calculated to generate revenues in any fiscal year that exceed four and twenty-five hundredths (4.25) times the total amount of permit fees collected from Class I and Class III solid waste landfills in fiscal year 1992-1993.

Provided, that the total fee revenues cannot exceed one and twenty-five hundredths (1.25) times the total amount collected from solid waste permit fees in fiscal year 1994-1995.

Should the amount of permit fees levied on and received from permits existing prior to June 30, 1995, exceed the amounts specified in subdivision (1)(B)(i) of this section in a fiscal year, the overcollections may be retained by the division to be used to reduce permit fees in subsequent years by relative amounts.

With the exception of major underground injection control wells, fees for no-discharge state permits will be capped at five hundred dollars ($500);

The rules shall provide that the fees shall be assessed on a per-facility basis for the following categories of permits:

Air;

Water; and

Solid waste.

All annual fees for air permits issued under the state implementation plan or the rules promulgated pursuant to the Clean Air Act, 42 U.S.C. § 7401 et seq., shall be assessed in accordance with the Clean Air Act, 42 U.S.C. § 7401 et seq.

The rules may include a provision for appropriate adjustments in the fees to reflect carryover fee collections in excess of the administrative costs of issuance, renewal, inspection, modification, and monitoring associated with these permits.

Notwithstanding other provisions of this subchapter and other applicable laws, the commission is authorized to promulgate and the division is authorized to collect annual fees from facilities electing to operate under the terms and conditions of a pollution prevention plan in lieu of an air permit. The annual pollution prevention plan fee shall be equal to the fee otherwise applicable to facilities operating under an air permit;

The division shall collect the permit fees as established by the commission and shall deny the issuance of an initial permit, a renewal permit, or a modification permit if and when any facility subject to control by the division fails or refuses to pay the fees after reasonable notice as established by the rules promulgated under this chapter;

The division shall require that any fee defined in this chapter shall be paid prior to the issuance of any permit; and

The division is hereby authorized to promulgate such rules necessary to administer the fees, rates, tolls, or charges for services established by this section and is directed to prescribe and collect such fees, rates, tolls, or charges for the services delivered by the division in such manner as may be necessary to support the programs of the division as directed by the Governor and the General Assembly.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 817, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1918; Acts 1987, No. 629, § 1; 1991, No. 789, § 1; 1993, No. 163, § 3; 1993, No. 165, § 3; 1993, No. 1254, §§ 1, 5; 1995, No. 509, § 3; 1995, No. 1056, § 1; 1997, No. 310, § 1; 1999, No. 1052, § 1; 1999, No. 1164, § 5; 2019, No. 315, §§ 423-426; 2019, No. 693, § 3; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2419-2422.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Sections 8-6-215 — 8-6-217 have been superseded by § 8-1-106.

As amended by Acts 1995, Nos. 509 and 1056, subdivision (1)(B)(i) also provided: “In raising the cap for total fee revenues, fees for solid waste permits shall not increase in fiscal years 1995-96 and 1996-97.”

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1983, No. 817, § 4, provided that the initial fee will not be enforced retroactively against water, solid waste, or air pollution control facilities that hold valid permits as of July 4, 1983.

Acts 1991, No. 609, § 1, provided: “It is the public policy of this state that vigorous efforts be made to protect our fragile environment. Recognizing that duties concerning protection of the environment have been assigned to several agencies of state government, it is found that to enhance efforts to protect the environment, authority for instituting civil suits to protect the environment in the courts of this state and of the United States should be placed in the office of the Attorney General.”

Acts 1991, No. 609, § 3, provided: “This Act shall not be construed as superseding or impairing any legal authority currently vested with the Arkansas Department of Pollution Control and Ecology, nor shall this Act in any way affect programs delegated by federal agencies to the Arkansas Department of Pollution Control and Ecology.”

Acts 1993, No. 1254, § 5, codified as subdivision (5) of this section, is also codified as §§ 8-1-105(c) and 8-7-226(d).

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rule” for “regulation” in (1)(A); substituted “rules” for “regulations” three times in (2), and once in (3); and deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (5).

The 2019 amendment by No. 693 substituted “8-6-214” for “8-6-213 [repealed], 8-6-214, 8-6-215 — 8-6-217 [superseded]” in (1)(A).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in the introductory language; and substituted “division” for “department” throughout the section.

8-1-104. Existing rules.

All existing rules of the Division of Environmental Quality not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter relating to subjects embraced within this chapter shall remain in full force and effect until expressly repealed, amended, or superseded if the rules do not conflict with the provisions of this chapter.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 817, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1921; 2019, No. 315, § 427; 2019, No. 910, § 2423.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in the section heading and twice in the section.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality”.

8-1-105. Division of Environmental Quality Fee Trust Fund.

A Division of Environmental Quality Fee Trust Fund is established on the books of the Treasurer of State, the Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.

All interest earnings and fees collected under the provisions of all laws administered by the Division of Environmental Quality shall be deposited into this fund unless otherwise provided by law. The division shall use these funds to defray the costs of operating the division.

The division is hereby authorized to promulgate such rules as are necessary to administer the fees, rates, tolls, or charges for services established by this section and is directed to prescribe and collect such fees, rates, tolls, or charges for the services delivered by the division in such manner as may be necessary to support the programs of the division as directed by the Governor and the General Assembly.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 817, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1920; Acts 1993, No. 1254, §§ 2, 5; 1999, No. 1164, § 6; 2007, No. 1281, § 36; 2019, No. 315, § 428; 2019, No. 910, § 2424.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1993, No. 1254, § 5, codified as subsection (c) of this section, is also codified as §§ 8-1-103(5) and 8-7-226(d).

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment inserted “Trust” in (a) and “interest earnings and” in (b).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (c).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in the section heading and throughout the section; and substituted “division” for “department” throughout the section.

Cross References.

Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality Fee Trust Fund, § 19-5-1137.

8-1-106. Definitions — Disclosure statements — Denial of application — Appeal — Rules.

As used in this section:

“Affiliated person” means:

Any officer, director, or partner of the applicant;

Any person employed by the applicant in a supervisory capacity over operations of the facility that is the subject of the application that may adversely impact the environment, or with discretionary authority over such operations;

Any person owning or controlling more than five percent (5%) of the applicant's debt or equity; and

Any person who is not now in compliance or has a history of noncompliance with the environmental laws, rules, or regulations of this state or any other jurisdiction and who through relationship by affinity or consanguinity or through any other relationship could be reasonably expected to significantly influence the applicant in a manner that could adversely affect the environment;

“Disclosure statement” means a written statement by the applicant that contains:

The full name and business address of the applicant and all affiliated persons;

The full name and business address of any legal entity in which the applicant holds a debt or equity interest of at least five percent (5%) or that is a parent company or subsidiary of the applicant, and a description of the ongoing organizational relationships as they may impact operations within the state;

A description of the experience and credentials of the applicant, including any past or present permits, licenses, certifications, or operational authorizations relating to environmental regulation;

A listing and explanation of any civil or criminal legal actions by government agencies involving environmental protection laws, rules, or regulations against the applicant and affiliated persons in the ten (10) years immediately preceding the filing of the application, including administrative enforcement actions resulting in the imposition of sanctions, permit or license revocations or denials issued by any state or federal authority, actions that have resulted in a finding or a settlement of a violation, and actions that are pending;

A listing of any federal environmental agency and any other environmental agency outside this state that has or has had regulatory responsibility over the applicant; and

Any other information the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality may require that relates to the competency, reliability, or responsibility of the applicant and affiliated persons; and

“History of noncompliance” means past operations by an applicant that clearly indicate a disregard for environmental regulation or a demonstrated pattern of prohibited conduct that could reasonably be expected to result in adverse environmental impact if a permit were issued.

Except as provided in subdivisions (b)(2) and (4) of this section, all applicants for the issuance or transfer of any permit, license, certification, or operational authority issued by the Division of Environmental Quality shall file a disclosure statement with their applications. Deliberate falsification or omission of relevant information from disclosure statements shall be grounds for civil or criminal enforcement action or administrative denial of a permit, license, certification, or operational authorization.

The following persons or entities are not required to file a disclosure statement pursuant to this section:

Governmental entities, consisting only of subdivisions or agencies of the federal government, agencies of the state government, counties, municipalities, or duly authorized regional solid waste management boards as defined by § 8-6-702.

This exemption shall not extend to improvement districts or any other subdivision of government that is not specifically instituted by an act of the General Assembly; and

Applicants for a general permit to be issued by the division pursuant to its authority to implement the National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System for storm water discharge or any other person or entity the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission may by rule exempt from the submissions of a disclosure statement.

Nothing in this subsection, including the exemptions in subdivision (b)(2) of this section, shall be construed as a limitation upon the authority of the director to deny a permit based upon a history of noncompliance to any applicant or for other just cause.

If the applicant is a publicly held company required to file periodic reports under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 or a wholly owned subsidiary of a publicly held company, the applicant shall not be required to submit a disclosure statement, but shall submit the most recent annual and quarterly reports required by the United States Securities and Exchange Commission that provide information regarding legal proceedings in which the applicant has been involved. The applicant shall submit such other information as the director may require that relates to the competency, reliability, or responsibility of the applicant and affiliated persons.

For a person or an entity seeking a renewal of an expiring permit, license, certification, or operational authorization, the disclosure requirements of this section shall be met if the person or entity:

Discloses any change in previously submitted information or verifies that the previously submitted information remains accurate; and

Submits the information on forms developed by the division.

The Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission may adopt rules exempting certain permits, licenses, certifications, or operational authorizations from the disclosure requirements and establish reasonable and appropriate disclosure information, if any, required for specific types of permits, licenses, certifications, or operational authorizations based on:

The scope of a permit, license, certification, or operational authorization; and

The person or entity that would receive a permit, license, certification, or operational authorization.

The director may deny the issuance or transfer of any permit, license, certification, or operational authority if he or she finds, based upon the disclosure statement and other investigation which he or she deems appropriate, that:

The applicant has a history of noncompliance with the environmental laws, rules, or regulations of this state or any other jurisdiction;

An applicant that owns or operates other facilities in the state is not in substantial compliance with, or on a legally enforceable schedule that will result in compliance with, the environmental laws or rules of this state; or

A person with a history of noncompliance with the environmental laws, rules, or regulations of this state or any other jurisdiction is affiliated with the applicant to the extent of being capable of significantly influencing the practices or operations of the applicant that could have an impact upon the environment.

In reaching any decision pursuant to the requirements of this section, the director shall consider:

The potential danger to the environment and public health and safety if the applicant's proposed activity is not conducted in a competent and responsible manner;

The degree to which past and present activities in this state and other jurisdictions directly bear upon the reliability, competence, and responsibility of the applicant; and

Any evidence of rehabilitation following past violations or convictions.

Any person or legal entity aggrieved by a decision of the director under this section may appeal to the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission through administrative procedures adopted by the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission.

The Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission shall adopt rules necessary to implement this section.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 454, § 1; 1993, No. 163, § 4; 1993, No. 165, § 4; 1993, No. 1052, § 1; 1995, No. 384, § 1; 1999, No. 1164, § 7; 2007, No. 1005, § 1; 2007, No. 1019, §§ 1, 2; 2009, No. 1199, §§ 1, 2; 2011, No. 222, § 1; 2019, No. 315, §§ 429-433; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2425-2428.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1991, No. 454, § 2, provided: “The provisions of this act expressly supersede those set out in Act 531 of 1989. This act does not supersede or affect in any way the Arkansas Surface Coal and Mining Act and implementing regulations as it impacts on the import of past or pending violations upon surface coal mining operators.”

The reference to the Arkansas Surface Coal and Mining Act in Acts 1991, No. 454, § 2, may refer to the Arkansas Surface Coal Mining and Reclamation Act of 1979.

Acts 1989, No. 531 was codified at § 8-6-213(a) [repealed] and §§ 8-6-215 — 8-6-217 [superseded].

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment by No. 1005 added “or any other person or entity the commission may by rule exempt from the submission of a disclosure statement” at the end of (b)(2)(B).

The 2007 amendment by No. 1019 substituted “means” for “includes, but is not limited to” in (a)(1)(A); substituted “subdivisions (b)(2) and (b)(4)” for “subdivision (4)” in (b)(1); substituted “subdivision (b)(2) of this section” for “subdivision (2) of this subsection” in (b)(3); added (b)(5) and (b)(6); and made related changes.

The 2009 amendment substituted “management boards as defined by § 8-6-702” for “authorities as defined by § 8-6-707” in (b)(2)(A)(i); consolidated (b)(5)(B) with (b)(5)(A); redesignated the subsequent subdivision as (b)(5)(B); and made related changes.

The 2011 amendment substituted “name and business address” for “name, business address, and social security number” in (a)(2)(A).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 inserted “rules” in (a)(1)(D), (a)(2)(D), and throughout (c); and substituted “rules” for “regulations” in the introductory language of (b)(6), (c)(2), and (f).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a)(2)(F) and (b)(1); and substituted “division” for “department” in (b)(2)(B) and (b)(5)(B).

U.S. Code.

The Securities Exchange Act of 1934, referred to in this section, is primarily codified as 15 U.S.C. § 78a et seq.

Cross References.

State water pollution control agency and permit program for discharges into navigable waters, § 8-4-208.

8-1-107. Inspections — Definitions — Investigations — Inspection warrant — Exceptions — Penalties.

General. Whenever it shall be necessary for the purpose of implementing or monitoring the enforcement of any law charged to the authority of the Division of Environmental Quality, any authorized employee or agent of the division may enter upon any public or private property for the purpose of obtaining information or conducting investigations or inspections, subject to the following provisions.

Definitions. As used in this section, the following terms shall have these ascribed meanings:

“Administrative inspections” means investigation by division personnel at facilities operating within the division's apparent regulatory jurisdiction;

“Facility” means the public or private area, premises, curtilage, building, or conveyance described as the subject of administrative inspection;

“Pervasively regulated facility or activity” means the activity or facility that is the location of activity authorized by the division through a permit, license, certification, or operational status approval; and

“Probable cause” means showing that an administrative search limited in scope is necessary to ensure compliance with or enforcement of laws, rules, federal regulations, or orders charged to the division for implementation.

For the purpose of conducting administrative inspections or applying for administrative warrants, probable cause may be provided to the division through complaints or other means that reasonably justify a limited and controlled administrative inspection.

Administrative Inspections.

Whenever the division obtains information that supports reasonable cause to believe that a violation of any law within its regulatory authority is being or has been violated, or that unauthorized regulated conduct is occurring or has occurred, division personnel or its agents may demand entry onto any property, public or private, to inspect any facility.

The division's investigation or inspection shall be limited to that necessary to confirm or deny the cause which prompted the investigation or inspection, and shall be conducted during daylight, during regular business hours, or, under emergency or extraordinary circumstances, at a time necessary to observe the suspected violation or unauthorized conduct.

Except under emergency circumstances, the division shall inform such facility's owner or agent of all information which forms the basis of its probable cause at the time of the inspection.

Nothing in this subsection shall be construed as requiring the division to forfeit the element of surprise in its inspection efforts.

Also, nothing in this section shall be construed as limiting the frequency of the periodic or random inspections of pervasively regulated facilities or activities.

For the purpose of this section, a rebuttable presumption concerning the jurisdiction of the division's regulatory authority is established as it regards the division's authority to inspect any facility.

Administrative Inspection Warrants. If consent to inspect is denied, the division may obtain an administrative inspection warrant from a judicial officer. Issuance and execution of administrative inspection warrants shall be as follows:

Any judicial officer otherwise authorized to issue search warrants within his or her jurisdiction may, upon proper oath or affirmation showing probable cause as defined by this section, issue administrative inspection warrants for the purpose of conducting administrative inspections authorized by any law, rule, or federal regulation administered by the division;

An administrative inspection warrant shall issue only upon an affidavit of a division official, employee, or agent having knowledge of the facts alleged, sworn to before the judge or magistrate and establishing the grounds for issuing the administrative inspection warrant. If the judge or magistrate is satisfied that grounds for the application exist or that there is probable cause to believe they exist, he or she shall issue an administrative inspection warrant identifying the facility to be inspected, and the purpose of the inspection. The administrative inspection warrant shall:

State the grounds for its issuance and the name of each person whose affidavit has been taken in support of the administrative inspection;

Be directed to a division officer or employee;

Command the person to whom it is directed to inspect the area, premises, building, or conveyance identified for the purpose specified;

Specifically identify any documents or samples to be gathered during the administrative inspection;

Direct that it be served during normal business hours unless emergency or extraordinary circumstances compel otherwise; and

Designate the judge or magistrate to whom it shall be returned;

If appropriate, the administrative inspection warrant may authorize the review and copying of documents which may be relevant to the purpose of the administrative inspection. If documents must be seized for the purpose of copying, the person serving the administrative inspection warrant shall prepare an inventory of documents taken. The inventory shall be made in the presence of the person executing the administrative inspection warrant and of the person from whose possession or facility the documents were taken, if present, or in the presence of at least one (1) credible person other than the person executing the administrative inspection warrant. A copy of the inventory shall be delivered to the person from whom or from whose facility the documents were taken. The seized documents shall be copied as soon as feasible under circumstances preserving their authenticity, then returned to the person from whom the documents were taken;

The administrative inspection warrant may authorize the taking of samples of materials generated, stored, or treated at the facility, or of the water, air, or soils within the facility's control or that may have been affected by the facility's operations. The person executing the administrative inspection warrant shall prepare an inventory of all samples taken. In any inspection conducted pursuant to an administrative inspection warrant in which the samples are taken, the division shall make split samples available to the person whose facility is being inspected;

An administrative inspection warrant issued pursuant to this section must be executed and returned within ten (10) days of its date unless, upon a showing of a need for additional time, the court orders otherwise. The return of the administrative inspection warrant shall be made promptly, accompanied by a written inventory of any documents or samples taken;

The judge or magistrate who has issued an administrative inspection warrant shall attach to the administrative inspection warrant a copy of the return and all papers returnable in connection with the administrative inspection warrant and file them with the clerk of the circuit court for the judicial district in which the administrative inspection was made;

This subsection does not prevent the inspection without a warrant of books and records pursuant to an administrative subpoena issued in accordance with duly adopted administrative procedures; and

A copy of the administrative inspection warrant and all supporting affidavits shall be provided to the person served, or left at the entry of the facility inspected.

Administrative Inspection Warrants — Exceptions. Notwithstanding subsection (d) of this section, an administrative inspection warrant shall not be required for any inspection, including the review and copying of documents and taking of samples, under the following circumstances:

For pervasively regulated facilities or activities as defined by this section whose permit, license, certification, or operational approval from the division provides notice that the division may inspect regulated activities to assure compliance. If the division has reason to believe that a violation of any law has or is occurring, the basis for such belief shall be communicated at the time of the inspection;

If the owner, operator, or agent in charge of the facility consents;

In situations presenting imminent danger to public health and safety or the environment;

In situations involving inspection of conveyances, if there is reasonable cause to believe that the mobility of the conveyance makes it impracticable to obtain an administrative inspection warrant;

In any other exception or emergency circumstance when time or opportunity to apply for an administrative inspection warrant is lacking;

In situations involving conditions that may be observed in an open field, from an area practically open to public access, or in plain view; or

In all other situations in which an administrative inspection warrant is not constitutionally required.

Penalties. Any knowing refusal of right of entry and inspection to division personnel as set out in this section is a violation subject to a fine of up to twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) or civil penalties up to twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1076, § 2; 2019, No. 315, §§ 434, 435; 2019, No. 693, § 4; 2019, No. 807, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 2429.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1991, No. 1076, § 1, provided: “The General Assembly hereby determines and declares that protection of the environment is of paramount governmental interest in the State of Arkansas, and that standards which will permit administrative inspections consonant with the United States and Arkansas Constitutions must be established which clarify the ADPC&E's inspection authority, and provide for the issuance of administrative inspection warrants when circumstances require. Therefore, the purpose of this act is to clarify and supplement the inspection authority vested with the department. This act shall be given a liberal interpretation so as to implement its remedial intent.”

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 inserted “rules, federal” in (b)(4)(A); and substituted “law, rule, or federal regulation” for “law or regulation” in (d)(1).

The 2019 amendment by No. 693 inserted “administrative inspection” throughout (d) and (e); substituted “subsection (d) of this section, an administrative inspection” for “the previous subsection an administrative” in the introductory language of (e); and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment by No. 807, in (f), substituted “knowing” for “willful and unjustified”, and substituted “is a violation” for “shall constitute a misdemeanor”.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a); and substituted “division” for “department” throughout the section.